Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.060

Salary fund—Reimbursement.

The county legislative authority of each county with a population of one hundred twenty-five thousand or more shall establish a salary fund to be used for paying the salaries and wages of all officials and employees. The county legislative authority of any other county may establish such a salary fund. Said salary fund shall be reimbursed from any county funds or other funds under the jurisdiction or control of the county treasurer or county auditor budgeted for salaries and wages. The deposits shall be made in the exact amount of the payroll or vouchers paid from the salary fund.

[ 1991 c 363 s 64; 1973 1st ex.s. c 38 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 214 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.33.060. Prior: 1961 c 273 s 1; prior: (i) 1935 c 94 s 1; 1933 ex.s. c 14 s 1; RRS s 4201-1. (ii) 1933 ex.s. c 14 s 2; RRS s 4201-2. (iii) 1933 ex.s. c 14 s 3; RRS s 4201-3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.